Massachusetts, session 194th, H4546.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
“Section 64(a). As used in this section the following terms shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Operate”, to pilot, fly, control, direct, or program the flight of an unmanned aircraft
system.
“Unmanned Aircraft System” or “UAS”, an unmanned aerial vehicle and associated
elements and support equipment required for the safe and efficient operation of the UAV,
including but not limited to, communications links and components that control the UAV.
“Unmanned Aerial Vehicle”, “UAV”, or “drone”, a powered aerial vehicle that:
(a) Does not carry a human operator and is operated without the possibility of direct
human intervention from within or on the aircraft;
of 5

(b) Uses aerodynamic forces to provide vehicle lift;
(c) Can fly autonomously or be piloted remotely and;
(d) Can be expendable or recoverable.
(b) No municipality shall enact or enforce any ordinance regulating the operation of
UAVs and UASs except as otherwise authorized by regulation or guideline promulgated by the
Federal Aviation Administration or the laws of this commonwealth.
(c) (1) No person shall operate or permit to be operated, any UAS or UAV in violation of
any FAA rule or regulation within the commonwealth. Whoever violates the provisions of this
paragraph shall be punished by a fine of not more than one-hundred dollars.
(2) A law enforcement officer who observes a violation of an FAA rule or regulation
committed by an operator of a UAS or UAV may request the offender to state their true name
and address. Whoever, upon such request, refuses to state their name and address or whoever
states a false name and address, or a name and address not in the ordinary use shall be punished
by a fine of not less than twenty dollars nor more than fifty dollars. An offender who refuses to
state their true name and address may be arrested without a warrant for such refusal, but no
person shall be arrested without a warrant for any other FAA rule or regulation violation
committed while operating a UAS or UAV.
(d) (1) No person shall equip or operate a UAS or UAV armed with a weapon capable of
causing serious bodily injury or death or is otherwise capable of firing or releasing a projectile
designed to cause serious bodily injury or death. Persons convicted of unauthorized operation of
a UAS or UAV under this paragraph shall be punished by a fine of not more than two-thousand
of 5

dollars or by imprisonment in a house of correction for not more than one year or both. Federal,
state, and municipal public safety explosive ordinance personnel are exempted from this
provision for the limited purpose of use of UAS or UAV for the disposal of explosive ordinance.
(2) No person shall operate a UAS or UAV in a manner so as to interfere with or disrupt
the flight of manned aircraft, or otherwise impede the normal course of operations of any
international, regional, municipal, or general aviation airport. Persons convicted of unauthorized
operation of a UAS or UAV under this paragraph shall be punished by a fine of not more than
one-thousand five-hundred dollars or by imprisonment in a house of correction for not more than
one year or both. Unauthorized operation of a UAS or UAV under this paragraph which results
in damage to a manned aircraft in flight or causes said aircraft to crash shall be punished by a
fine of not more than ten-thousand dollars or by imprisonment in a house of correction for not
more than two and one-half years or both.
(3) No person shall knowingly or intentionally operate a UAS or UAV so as to interfere
with or impede first responders or law enforcement actively responding to an emergency.
Persons convicted of unauthorized operation of a UAS or UAV under this paragraph shall be
punished by a fine of not more than one-thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in a house of
correction for not more than six months, or both.
(e) No person shall operate a UAS or UAV for the purpose of conducting surveillance or
observation of an individual on private real property owned or leased by the individual inclusive
of the curtilage without said individual’s consent. Improper use of a UAS or UAV under this
paragraph shall be deemed a violation of section 1B of chapter 214 of the General Laws,
provided however that use of a UAS or UAV for legitimate commercial purposes shall not be
of 5

deemed a violation of said section 1B of chapter 214. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
subsection, use of UASs or UAVs by law enforcement for observational or surveillance purposes
is permitted:
(i) if the law enforcement agency first obtains a search warrant authorizing the use of a
UAS or UAV;
(ii) to counter the risk of a terrorist incident if the United States Secretary for Homeland
Security or the Secretary of the Executive Office of Public Safety and Security determines
credible intelligence exists indicating the risk of a terrorist incident;
(iii) if the law enforcement agency possesses reasonable suspicion under the
circumstances that use of a UAS or UAV is necessary to prevent imminent danger to life, to
conduct a pursuit of an escapee or suspect, or to facilitate a search for a missing person; or
(iv) to document a crime scene or crash scene for investigative, evidentiary, or crash
reconstruction purposes.
(f)(1) Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, a law
enforcement agency in possession of images, footage, data, or recordings captured from the use
of a UAS or UAV shall permanently erase or destroy or cause to be destroyed all images,
footage, data, or recordings captured from a UAS or UAV not later than 120 days following the
date on which the images, footage, data, or recordings were captured.
(2) The law enforcement agency may retain said UAS or UAV images, footage, data, or
recordings beyond 120 days if such information contains evidence of a crime or is relevant to an
ongoing investigation or judicial proceeding.
of 5

(g) If any part of this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, preempted, or
invalid, such decision shall not affect the remainder of this section.
of 5